Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1509
Lease or disposition; when authorized.

The governing body of any city or village, authorized by section 18-1501 to acquire an aviation field, shall have power to lease or dispose of such aviation field or any portion thereof when doing so will not damage the public need for such airfield.

Laws 1929, c. 35, § 5, p. 149;

C.S.1929, § 19-805;

R.S.1943, § 19-807;

Laws 1955, c. 51, § 5, p. 172;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 89.

Municipality may lease an airport or other air navigation facility. Brasier v. Cribbett, 166 Neb. 145, 88 N.W.2d 235 (1958).